Indiana, session 2026, HB1264.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 31-9-2-81.7 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 81.7. "Near fatality", for purposes of IC 31-33-18.5,
means a severe childhood injury or condition that is certified by a
physician as being life threatening.
SECTION 2. IC 31-33-18-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.77-2023,
SECTION 8, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) Except as provided in section 1.5 of this
chapter and IC 31-33-18.5, the following are confidential:
(1) Reports made under this article (or IC 31-6-11 before its
repeal).
(2) Any other information, documents, reports, pictures, videos,
images, or recordings obtained, possessed, produced, or created
by:
(A) the division of family resources;
(B) the local office;
(C) the department; or
HB 1264—LS 6882/DI 148


(D) the department of child services ombudsman established
by IC 4-13-19-3;
concerning a child or family with whom the department has
received a report or referral or has been involved with during any
stage of the department's investigation, including post-assessment
or post-adoption activity.
(b) Except as provided in section 1.5 of this chapter and
IC 31-33-18.5, all records held by:
(1) the division of family resources;
(2) a local office;
(3) the department;
(4) a local child fatality review team established under
IC 16-49-2;
(5) the statewide child fatality review committee established
under IC 16-49-4; or
(6) the department of child services ombudsman established by
IC 4-13-19-3;
regarding the death of a child determined to be a result of abuse,
abandonment, or neglect are confidential and may not be disclosed.
SECTION 3. IC 31-33-18-1.5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.77-2023,
SECTION 9, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1.5. (a) This section applies to records held by:
(1) a local office;
(2) the department; or
(3) the department of child services ombudsman established by
IC 4-13-19-3;
regarding a child whose death or near fatality may have been the result
of abuse, abandonment, or neglect.
(b) For purposes of subsection (a), a child's death or near fatality
may have been the result of abuse, abandonment, or neglect if:
(1) an entity described in subsection (a) determines that the child's
death or near fatality is the result of abuse, abandonment, or
neglect; or
(2) a prosecuting attorney files:
(A) an indictment or information; or
(B) a complaint alleging the commission of a delinquent act;
that, if proven, would cause a reasonable person to believe that
the child's death or near fatality may have been the result of
abuse, abandonment, or neglect.
Upon the request of any person, or upon its own motion, the court
exercising juvenile jurisdiction in the county in which the child's death
or near fatality occurred shall determine whether the allegations
HB 1264—LS 6882/DI 148


contained in the indictment, information, or complaint described in
subdivision (2), if proven, would cause a reasonable person to believe
that the child's death or near fatality may have been the result of abuse,
abandonment, or neglect.
(c) If the juvenile court finds that the child's death or near fatality
was the result of abuse, abandonment, or neglect, the court shall make
written findings and provide a copy of the findings and the indictment,
information, or complaint described under subsection (b)(2) to the
department.
(d) As used in this section:
(1) "case" means:
(A) any intake report or other documentation such as a referral
or other matter received or generated by the department;
(B) any investigation or assessment conducted by the
department; or
(C) ongoing involvement between the department and a child
or family that is the result of:
(i) a program of informal adjustment; or
(ii) a child in need of services action;
for which related records and documents have not been expunged
as required by law or by a court at the time the department is
notified of a fatality or near fatality;
(2) "contact" means in person communication about a case in
which:
(A) the child who is the victim of a fatality or near fatality is
alleged to be a victim; or
(B) the perpetrator of the fatality or near fatality is alleged to
be the perpetrator;
(3) "identifying information" means information that identifies an
individual, including an individual's:
(A) name, address, date of birth, occupation, place of
employment, and telephone number;
(B) employer identification number, mother's maiden name,
Social Security number, or any identification number issued by
a governmental entity;
(C) unique biometric data, including the individual's
fingerprint, voice print, or retina or iris image;
(D) unique electronic identification number, address, or
routing code;
(E) telecommunication identifying information; or
(F) telecommunication access device, including a card, a plate,
a code, an account number, a personal identification number,
HB 1264—LS 6882/DI 148


an electronic serial number, a mobile identification number, or
another telecommunications service or device or means of
account access;
(4) "life threatening" means an injury or condition that is
categorized as "serious" or "critical" in patient hospital records;
and
(5) "near fatality" means a severe childhood injury or condition
that is certified by a physician as being life threatening.
(e) This subsection does not apply to records concerning a child
fatality or near fatality that the department is required to publish
under IC 31-33-18.5. Unless:
(1) a police investigation or criminal prosecution is ongoing; or
(2) information in a record is otherwise confidential under state
or federal law;
a record described in subsection (a) that has been redacted in
accordance with this section is not confidential and may be disclosed
to any person who requests the record. The person requesting the
record may be required to pay the reasonable expenses of copying the
record.
(f) When a person requests a record described in subsection (a), the
entity having control of the record shall immediately transmit a copy of
the record to the court exercising juvenile jurisdiction in the county in
which the death or near fatality of the child occurred. However, if the
court requests that the entity having control of a record transmit the
original record, the entity shall transmit the original record.
(g) Upon receipt of the record described in subsection (a), the court
shall, within thirty (30) days, redact the record to exclude:
(1) identifying information described in subsection (d)(3)(B)
through (d)(3)(F) of a person; and
(2) all identifying information of a child less than eighteen (18)
years of age.
(h) The court shall disclose the record redacted in accordance with
subsection (g) to any person who requests the record, if the person has
paid:
(1) to the entity having control of the record, the reasonable
expenses of copying under IC 5-14-3-8; and
(2) to the court, the reasonable expenses of copying the record.
(i) The data and information in a record disclosed under this section
must include the following:
(1) A summary of the report of abuse or neglect and a factual
description of the contents of the report.
(2) The age and gender of the child.
HB 1264—LS 6882/DI 148


(3) The cause of the fatality or near fatality, if the cause has been
determined.
(4) Whether the department had any contact with the child or the
perpetrator before the fatality or near fatality, and, if the
department had contact, the following:
(A) The frequency of the contact with the child or the
perpetrator before the fatality or near fatality and the date on
which the last contact occurred before the fatality or near
fatality.
(B) A summary of the status of the child's case at the time of
the fatality or near fatality, including:
(i) whether the child's case was closed by the department
before the fatality or near fatality; and
(ii) if the child's case was closed as described under item (i),
the date of closure and the reasons that the case was closed.
(j) The court's determination under subsection (g) that certain
identifying information or other information is not relevant to
establishing the facts and circumstances leading to the death or near
fatality of a child is not admissible in a criminal proceeding or civil
action.
SECTION 4. IC 31-33-18-5, AS ADDED BY P.L.48-2012,
SECTION 40, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. (a) Except as provided in IC 31-33-18.5, an
audio recording of a telephone call to the child abuse hotline is
confidential and may be released only upon court order.
(b) An audio recording of a report of child abuse or neglect that is
the subject of a complaint made to a prosecuting attorney under
IC 31-33-22-3 shall be released without a court order to the prosecuting
attorney upon written request of the prosecuting attorney.
SECTION 5. IC 31-33-18.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 18.5. Child Fatalities Public Transparency
Sec. 1. This chapter applies to the following:
(1) Reports made under this article (or IC 31-6-11 before its
repeal).
(2) Any other information obtained or written reports taken
concerning the reports in the possession of:
(A) the division of family resources;
(B) the local office;
(C) the department; or
(D) the department of child services ombudsman
HB 1264—LS 6882/DI 148


established by IC 4-13-19-3.
Sec. 2. (a) Notwithstanding IC 31-33-18, the department shall
promptly provide information to the public regarding a case of
child abuse or neglect that has resulted in a child fatality or near
fatality.
(b) Subject to subsection (d), and to the extent permitted by
federal law, the department shall provide preliminary information
as follows:
(1) In the case of a child fatality, the department's disclosure
must include the following:
(A) The deceased child's name, age, and gender.
(B) The county or general location of the residence for the
child who died.
(C) The fact that a child suffered a fatality as the result of
abuse or neglect.
(D) Following an arrest for the fatality, the public arrest
information and court records for the alleged perpetrator,
unless the disclosure would violate the privacy of a victim.
(E) Whether there have been reports or any current or
past cases of abuse or neglect involving the child or the
alleged perpetrator.
(F) Actions taken by the department in response to the
fatality.
(G) A detailed synopsis of earlier reports or cases of abuse
or neglect involving the child or the alleged perpetrator
and of the actions taken or determinations made by the
department in response to the earlier reports or cases.
(2) In the case of a child's near fatality, the department's
disclosure must include the following:
(A) The child's age and gender.
(B) The county or general location of the residence for the
child who suffered a near fatality.
(C) The fact that a child suffered a near fatality as the
result of abuse or neglect.
(D) Following an arrest for the near fatality, the public
arrest information and court records for the alleged
perpetrator, unless the disclosure would violate the privacy
of a victim.
(E) Whether there have been reports or any current or
past cases of abuse or neglect involving the child or the
alleged perpetrator.
(F) Actions taken by the department in response to the
HB 1264—LS 6882/DI 148


near fatality.
(G) A detailed synopsis of earlier reports or cases of abuse
or neglect involving the child or the alleged perpetrator
and of the actions taken or determinations made by the
department in response to the earlier reports or cases.
(c) Subject to subsection (d), if additional information is
requested by a person under this chapter:
(1) before releasing additional information, the department
shall notify the prosecuting attorney;
(2) the prosecuting attorney shall promptly notify the
department if the prosecuting attorney believes the release
would cause a specific, material harm to a criminal
investigation or prosecution; and
(3) after consulting with the prosecuting attorney, the
department shall produce to the requestor as much additional
information as possible about a case of child abuse or neglect
under this chapter.
(d) The department must take precautions to protect the
identity of:
(1) a person who reports child abuse or neglect; and
(2) any potential child abuse or neglect victim of an alleged
perpetrator.
Sec. 3. Not later than ninety (90) days after the date on which
the department's report for a case involving a child fatality or near
fatality is completed, the department shall provide to the public a
summary report that includes the following:
(1) Any actions taken by the department in response to the
case, including changes in policies or practices that have been
made to address any issues raised in the review of the case.
(2) Information prescribed in section 4 of this chapter.
Sec. 4. If the summary report involves a child who was residing
in the child's home at the time of the child's fatality or near
fatality, the summary report must contain the following:
(1) Whether the department was providing services to the
child, a member of the child's family, or the alleged
perpetrator at the time of the child fatality or near fatality. If
services were provided, the date on which the last contact
occurred between the entity providing services and the person
receiving the services before the child fatality or near fatality.
(2) Whether the child, a member of the child's family, or the
alleged perpetrator was the subject of a department report at
the time of the child fatality or near fatality.
HB 1264—LS 6882/DI 148


(3) Whether there was an open child in need of services case
for the child or a member of the child's family at the time of
the child fatality or near fatality.
(4) All:
(A) involvement of:
(i) the child's parent, guardian, or custodian; and
(ii) the alleged perpetrator;
in a situation for which a department report, whether
substantiated or unsubstantiated, was made within the
preceding five (5) years of the child fatality or near
fatality; and
(B) services provided to the child or the child's family
within the preceding five (5) years of the child fatality or
near fatality.
(5) Any investigation by the department for a report
concerning the child, a member of the child's family, or the
alleged perpetrator since the child fatality or near fatality.
(6) Any services provided to:
(A) the child since the child's near fatality; or
(B) the child's family since the child fatality or near
fatality.
HB 1264—LS 6882/DI 148


COMMITTEE REPORT
Mr. Speaker: Your Committee on Family, Children and Human
Affairs, to which was referred House Bill 1264, has had the same under
consideration and begs leave to report the same back to the House with
the recommendation that said bill be amended as follows:
Page 6, line 6, after "(d)," insert "and to the extent permitted by
federal law,".
and when so amended that said bill do pass.
(Reference is to HB 1264 as introduced.)
DEVON
Committee Vote: yeas 11, nays 0.
HB 1264—LS 6882/DI 148